test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-otanisimaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - otânisimâw - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, daughter, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitânisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitânisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitânisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitânisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otânisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitânisinânihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitânisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitânisiwâwihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otânisiwâwihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otânisiyihk

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicânisisisinânihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicânisisisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicânisisisiwâwihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiwâwihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
